Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-912
Tax; Director of Insurance; disposition;
exceptions.

The Director of Insurance shall transmit fifty
percent of the taxes paid in conformity with Chapter 44, article 1, and Chapter
77, article 9, to the State Treasurer, forty percent of such taxes paid to
the General Fund, and ten percent of such taxes paid to the Mutual Finance
Assistance Fund promptly upon completion of his or her audit and examination
and in no event later than May 1 of each year, except that:

(1) All fire insurance taxes paid pursuant to sections 44-150 and 81-523
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund;

(2) All workers' compensation insurance taxes paid pursuant to section
44-150 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Compensation
Court Cash Fund; and

(3) Commencing with the premium and related retaliatory taxes for the
taxable year ending December 31, 2001, and for each taxable year thereafter,
all premium and related retaliatory taxes imposed by section 44-150 or 77-908
paid by insurers writing health insurance in this state shall be remitted
to the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Distributive Fund.

Laws 1951, c. 256, § 6, p. 880;

Laws 1986, LB 1114, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 302, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 35;

Laws 1996, LB 693, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 27;

Laws 1999, LB 113, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 44;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 9, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 408, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 84;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 702;

Laws 2010, LB698, § 4.